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DI644-09

DTC P0443/94 | Evaporative Emission Control System Purge
Control Vent Control Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

To reduce HC emissions, evaporated fuel from the fuel tank is routed through the charcoal canister to the
intake manifold for combustion in the cylinders.

The engine ECU changes the duty signal to the VSV for the EVAP so that the intake quantity of HC emissions
is appropriate for the driving conditions (engine load, engine speed, vehicle speed, etc.) after the engine is
wamed up.

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area
* Openorshortin VSV circuit for EVAP
P0443/94 Properresponse to engine ECU command does notoccur *\/SVforEVAP
*EngineECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

When using hand-held tester:

HINT:

Read freeze frame data using a hand-held tester. Because freeze frame records the engine conditions when
the malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, it is useful for determining whether the vehicle was run-
ning or stopped, the engine was warmed up or not, the air-fuel ratio was lean or rich, etc. at the time of the
malfunction.

1 Connect hand-held tester and check operation of VSV for EVAP.

PREPARATION:

(@ Connect the hand-held tester to the DLC3.

(b)  Turn the ignition switch and push the hand-held tester
main switch ON.

(c) Selectthe ACTIVE TEST mode on the hand-held tester.

CHECK:

Check the operation of the VSV when the VSV is operated by

the hand-held tester.

A13575 O_K

VSV is ON:

Air from port E flows out through port F.

VSV is OFF:

Air from port E flows out with hardly through port F.

OK Check for intermittent problems
(See page DI-4).

@

2 [ Check VSV for EVAP (See Pub. No. RM630E on page FI-62).

@

3 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between EFI main relay
(Marking: EFIl) and engine ECU (See page IN-19).

NG> Replace VSV for EVAP.

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).

When not using hand-held tester:

1 Check VSV for EVAP (See Pub. No. RM630E on page FI-62).

@

2 [ Check voltage between terminal PRG of engine ECU connector and body
ground.

NG> Replace VSV for EVAP.

PREPARATION:

(@ Remove the engine room ECU cover.

(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

CHECK:

Measure the voltage between terminal PRG of the engine ECU
connector and body ground.

O ol

U l Voltage: 9 - 14 V

A16785

nector between EFl main relay (Marking: EFI)

NG Check for open and short in harness and con-
and engine ECU (See page IN-19).

@

Check and replace engine ECU (See page
IN-19).
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